District of Columbia statutes.
8-1006

Repealed

Recyclable materials recovery targets.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 7, 36 DCR 595
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-178, § 3(c), 41 DCR 5205
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
This section is referenced in § 8-1008 and § 8-1014.
1981 Ed., § 6-3406.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-226, the “D.C. Solid Waste Management & Multi-Material Recycling Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-160, July 20, 1989.